apertium-sco.sco.dix
<pardef n="let__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tten</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/ie__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>           <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>           <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ay</l>           <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ien</l>          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="los/s__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>            <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>            <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sin</l>          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sin</l>          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sin</l>          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ma/k__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>k</l>            <r>k<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>k</l>            <r>k<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ks</l>           <r>k<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>           <r>k<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>           <r>k<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kin</l>          <r>k<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kin</l>          <r>k<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kin</l>          <r>k<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="me/et__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>           <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>           <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>            <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>            <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etin</l>         <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etin</l>         <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etin</l>         <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="owerset__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ten</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pit__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tin</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="r/ead__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ead</l>          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ead</l>          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eads</l>         <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ade</l>          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ead</l>          <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eadin</l>        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eadin</l>        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eadin</l>        <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="redd__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="r/in__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ins</l>          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>           <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>           <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>innin</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>innin</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>innin</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="r/ise__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ise</l>          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ise</l>          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ises</l>         <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ase</l>          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>           <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isin</l>         <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isin</l>         <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isin</l>         <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="let">               <i>let</i><par n="let__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lie">               <i>l</i><par n="l/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="loss">              <i>los</i><par n="los/s__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mak">               <i>ma</i><par n="ma/k__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="owerset">           <i>owerset</i><par n="owerset__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pit">               <i>pit</i><par n="pit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="redd">              <i>redd</i><par n="redd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rise">              <i>rise</i><par n="r/ise__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rin">               <i>rin</i><par n="r/in__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="set">               <i>set</i><par n="pit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bet">              <i>bet</i><par n="let__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stot">             <i>stot</i><par n="let__vblex"/></e>
